District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-301.82

Foreign corporations — Conducting affairs without certificate of authority; validity of contracts or corporate acts not impaired; liabilities.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 297, Pub. L. 87-569, § 82
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 431(a), 32 DCR 4450
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-301.82.
1981 Ed., § 29-583.
1973 Ed., § 29-1082.